Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0589.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1290. (1) The board of a school district or intermediate school district shall not prohibit the participation of an eligible child in any extracurricular activities offered by a school operated by the board. (2) The board of a school district or intermediate school district shall ensure that the school district or intermediate school district is not a member of an athletic conference or statewide interscholastic athletic association and does not participate in events operated or sponsored by a conference or association that has a policy, bylaw, rule, or regulation that prohibits an eligible child's participation in any interscholastic athletics offered by a school operated by the board. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Eligible child" means a child who meets all of the following criteria: (i) Resides within the school district or intermediate school district that offers the extracurricular activities that the child is seeking to participate in under subsection (1). (ii) Is being homeschooled or attending a nonpublic school during the child's participation in the extracurricular activities described in subsection (1). (iii) Meets all other applicable eligibility standards for participation in the extracurricular activities. (b) "Extracurricular activities" includes, but is not limited to, the following activities that are offered by a school district or intermediate school district: (i) Interscholastic athletics. (ii) Theater or drama productions. (iii) Band, orchestra, or other musical programs. (iv) Debate team.